Florida, session 2026, SB1462.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 9 10 Section 1.âSubsection (1) of section 414.095, Florida 11 Statutes, is amended to read: 12 414.095âDetermining eligibility for temporary cash 13 assistance.â 14 (1)âELIGIBILITY.âAn applicant must meet the eligibility 15 requirements of this section before receiving services or 16 temporary cash assistance under this chapter, except that an 17 applicant is shall be required to register for work and engage 18 in work activities in accordance with s. 445.024, as designated 19 by the local workforce development board, and may receive 20 support services or child care assistance in conjunction with 21 such requirement. The department shall make a determination of 22 eligibility based on the criteria listed in this chapter. The 23 department shall monitor continued eligibility for temporary 24 cash assistance through periodic reviews consistent with the 25 food assistance eligibility process. Benefits may not be denied 26 to an individual solely based on a felony drug conviction, 27 unless the conviction is for trafficking pursuant to s. 893.135. 28 An individual may not be denied benefits solely on the basis of 29 a drug trafficking conviction pursuant to s. 893.135 if the 30 conviction was obtained during a period of time in which the 31 department has determined the individual was an active victim of 32 human trafficking, as defined in s. 943.0583(1). To be eligible 33 under this section, an individual convicted of a drug felony 34 must be satisfactorily meeting the requirements of the temporary 35 cash assistance program, including all substance abuse treatment 36 requirements. Within the limits specified in this chapter, the 37 state opts out of the provision of Pub. L. No. 104-193, s. 115, 38 that eliminates eligibility for temporary cash assistance and 39 food assistance for any individual convicted of a controlled 40 substance felony. 41 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.